Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 04. Accountants.

Cross references. —

For transitional provision authorizing persons who, on January 1, 2011, hold permits or practice privileges under this chapter, to continue to practice under the authority of the permit or practice privilege until its normal expiration under the former provisions of this chapter before the chapter’s 2010 amendments, see § 44,
ch. 67, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For board of public accountancy, see 12 AAC 04.

Collateral references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d, Accountants, § 1 et seq.

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutory provisions respecting persons who may prepare tax returns for others,
10 ALR2d 1443.

Conclusiveness of statement or decision of accountant or similar third person under contract between others requiring property to be valued by him, 50 ALR2d 1268.

Tax preparer’s liability to taxpayer in connection with preparation of tax returns, 81 ALR3d 1119.

Accountant’s malpractice liability to client, 92 A.L.R.3d 396.

Valuation of goodwill in accounting practice for purposes of divorce court’s property distribution, 77 ALR4th 609.

Goodwill in accounting practice as subject to distribution on dissolution of marriage, 77 ALR4th 645.

Privileged communications between accountant and client—limitations or restrictions, waiver, and persons entitled to invoke,
26 ALR7th 8.

What constitutes privileged communications with preparer of federal tax returns so as to render communication inadmissible in federal tax prosecution, 36 ALR Fed. 686.